Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-461
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited liability partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of sections 67-457 to 67-461.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 61.